Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.395

Vancouver national historic reserve—Designated partner representative—Duties of Washington state historical society.

The legislature affirms that the Washington state historical society is the state's designated partner representative for the Vancouver national historic reserve. Accordingly, the Washington state historical society shall:

(1) Participate in the regularly scheduled coordination meetings of the Vancouver national historic reserve partners;

(2) Participate in the development of management, education, and interpretive plans and policies associated with the Vancouver national historic reserve; and

(3) Develop and submit to the office of financial management and the legislature operating and capital budget requests concurrent with the biennial cycle and oversee the management of all funds appropriated by the state for the Vancouver national historic reserve.

[ 2017 c 117 s 1; 2007 c 138 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—2007 c 138: See note following RCW 27.34.390.